Wisconsin, session 2025, AB999.
do enact as follows:AB999,11Section 1. 20.921 (1) (a) 2g. of the statutes is created to read:AB999,2,3220.921 (1) (a) 2g. If the employee is an employee of the University of Wisconsin 3Hospitals and Clinics Authority, payment of dues to employee organizations.AB999,24Section 2. 40.02 (25) (b) 8. of the statutes is amended to read:AB999,2,7540.02 (25) (b) 8. Any other state employee for whom coverage is authorized 6under a collective bargaining agreement pursuant to subch. I or V of ch. 111 or 7under s. 230.12 or 233.10.AB999,38Section 3. 40.05 (4) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB999,4,4940.05 (4) (b) Except as provided under pars. (bc) and (bp), accumulated 10unused sick leave under ss. 13.121 (4), 36.30, 230.35 (2), 233.10, 238.04 (8), and 11757.02 (5) and subch. I or V of ch. 111 of any eligible employee shall, at the time of 12death, upon qualifying for an immediate annuity or for a lump sum payment under 13s. 40.25 (1) or upon termination of creditable service and qualifying as an eligible 14employee under s. 40.02 (25) (b) 6. or 10., be converted, at the employee’s highest 1basic pay rate he or she received while employed by the state, to credits for payment 2of health insurance premiums on behalf of the employee or the employee’s surviving 3insured dependents. Any supplemental compensation that is paid to a state 4employee who is classified under the state classified civil service as a teacher, 5teacher supervisor, or education director for the employee’s completion of 6educational courses that have been approved by the employee’s employer is 7considered as part of the employee’s basic pay for purposes of this paragraph. The 8full premium for any eligible employee who is insured at the time of retirement, or 9for the surviving insured dependents of an eligible employee who is deceased, shall 10be deducted from the credits until the credits are exhausted and paid from the 11account under s. 40.04 (10), and then deducted from annuity payments, if the 12annuity is sufficient. The department shall provide for the direct payment of 13premiums by the insured to the insurer if the premium to be withheld exceeds the 14annuity payment. Upon conversion of an employee’s unused sick leave to credits 15under this paragraph or par. (bf), the employee or, if the employee is deceased, the 16employee’s surviving insured dependents may initiate deductions from those 17credits or may elect to delay initiation of deductions from those credits, but only if 18the employee or surviving insured dependents are covered by a comparable health 19insurance plan or policy during the period beginning on the date of the conversion 20and ending on the date on which the employee or surviving insured dependents 21later elect to initiate deductions from those credits. If an employee or an employee’s 22surviving insured dependents elect to delay initiation of deductions from those 23credits, an employee or the employee’s surviving insured dependents may only later 1elect to initiate deductions from those credits during the annual enrollment period 2under par. (be). A health insurance plan or policy is considered comparable if it 3provides hospital and medical benefits that are substantially equivalent to the 4standard health insurance plan established under s. 40.52 (1).AB999,45Section 4. 40.05 (5) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB999,4,10640.05 (5) Income continuation insurance premiums. (intro.) For the 7income continuation insurance provided under subch. V the employee shall pay the 8amount remaining after the employer has contributed the following or, if different, 9the amount determined under a collective bargaining agreement under subch. I or 10V of ch. 111 or s. 230.12 or 233.10:AB999,511Section 5. 40.05 (5) (b) 4. of the statutes is amended to read:AB999,4,141240.05 (5) (b) 4. The accrual and crediting of sick leave shall be determined in 13accordance with ss. 13.121 (4), 36.30, 230.35 (2), 233.10, 238.04 (8), and 757.02 (5) 14and subch. I or V of ch. 111.AB999,615Section 6. 40.05 (6) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB999,4,231640.05 (6) (a) Except as otherwise provided in accordance with a collective 17bargaining agreement under subch. I or V of ch. 111 or s. 230.12 or 233.10, each 18insured employee under the age of 70 and annuitant under the age of 65 shall pay 19for group life insurance coverage a sum, approved by the group insurance board, 20which shall not exceed 60 cents monthly for each $1,000 of group life insurance, 21based upon the last amount of insurance in force during the month for which 22earnings are paid. The equivalent premium may be fixed by the group insurance 23board if the annual compensation is paid in other than 12 monthly installments.AB999,71Section 7. 40.62 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB999,5,5240.62 (2) Sick leave accumulation shall be determined in accordance with 3rules of the department, any collective bargaining agreement under subch. I or V of 4ch. 111, and ss. 13.121 (4), 36.30, 49.825 (4) (d) and (5) (d), 49.826 (4) (d), 230.35 (2), 5233.10, 238.04 (8), 757.02 (5) and 978.12 (3).AB999,86Section 8. 111.02 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB999,6,27111.02 (3) “Collective bargaining unit” means all of the employees of one 8employer, employed within the state, except as provided in s. 111.05 (5) and except 9that where a majority of the employees engaged in a single craft, division, 10department or plant have voted by secret ballot as provided in s. 111.05 (2) to 11constitute such group a separate bargaining unit they shall be so considered, but, in 12appropriate cases, and to aid in the more efficient administration of this 13subchapter, the commission may find, where agreeable to all parties affected in any 14way thereby, an industry, trade or business comprising more than one employer in 15an association in any geographical area to be a “collective bargaining unit”. A 16collective bargaining unit thus established by the commission shall be subject to all 17rights by termination or modification given by this subchapter in reference to 18collective bargaining units otherwise established under this subchapter. Two or 19more collective bargaining units may bargain collectively through the same 20representative where a majority of the employees in each separate unit have voted 21by secret ballot as provided in s. 111.05 (2) so to do. Two or more collective 22bargaining units of employees of the University of Wisconsin Hospitals and Clinics 23Authority may bargain collectively through the same representative where a 1majority of the employees in each separate unit have indicated their desire to so do 2by petition for certification.AB999,93Section 9. 111.02 (7) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 111.02 (7) (a) (intro.) 4and amended to read:AB999,6,65111.02 (7) (a) (intro.) “Employer” means a person who engages the services of 6an employee, and includes a all of the following:AB999,6,871. A person acting on behalf of an employer within the scope of his or her 8authority, express or implied.AB999,109Section 10. 111.02 (7) (a) 2. of the statutes is created to read:AB999,6,1010111.02 (7) (a) 2. The University of Wisconsin Hospitals and Clinics Authority.AB999,1111Section 11. 111.02 (10m) of the statutes is created to read:AB999,6,2112111.02 (10m) “Petition for certification” means any combination of 13membership cards, evidence of dues payments, petitions to be represented by a 14bargaining representative, or other evidence of the desire of an employee of the 15University of Wisconsin Hospitals and Clinics Authority to be represented by an 16employee organization for the purpose of collective bargaining, including evidence 17that satisfies the provisions of ch. 137. Evidence of the desire of an employee of the 18University of Wisconsin Hospitals and Clinics Authority to be represented by an 19employee organization for the purpose of collective bargaining may include 20electronic authorization or voice authorization that satisfies the provisions of ch. 21137 that is used in lieu of an election.AB999,1222Section 12. 111.05 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:AB999,7,21111.05 (title) Representatives, petitions for certification, and 2elections.AB999,133Section 13. 111.05 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB999,7,154111.05 (1) Representatives chosen for the purposes of collective bargaining by 5a majority of the employees voting in a collective bargaining unit shall be the 6exclusive representatives of all of the employees in such unit for the purposes of 7collective bargaining, except for employees of the University of Wisconsin Hospitals 8and Clinics Authority, who may choose an exclusive representative for the purposes 9of collective bargaining by submitting a petition for certification that demonstrates 10a majority of employees authorize the representative for the purposes of collective 11bargaining as provided in sub. (3p) in lieu of an election, provided that any 12individual employee or any minority group of employees in any collective bargaining 13unit shall have the right at any time to present grievances to their employer in 14person or through representatives of their own choosing, and the employer shall 15confer with them in relation thereto. AB999,1416Section 14. 111.05 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB999,7,2217111.05 (2) Whenever Except as provided in sub. (5), whenever a question 18arises concerning the determination of a collective bargaining unit, it shall be 19determined by secret ballot, and the commission, upon request, shall cause the 20ballot to be taken in such manner as to show separately the wishes of the employees 21in any craft, division, department or plant as to the determination of the collective 22bargaining unit.AB999,1523Section 15. 111.05 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB999,8,151111.05 (3) Whenever Except as provided in sub. (3p), whenever a question 2arises concerning the representation of employees in a collective bargaining unit 3the commission shall determine the representatives thereof by taking a secret 4ballot of employees and certifying in writing the results thereof to the interested 5parties and to their employer or employers. There shall be included on any ballot 6for the election of representatives the names of all persons submitted by an 7employee or group of employees participating in the election, except that the 8commission may, in its discretion, exclude from the ballot a person who, at the time 9of the election, stands deprived of the person’s rights under this subchapter by 10reason of a prior adjudication of the person’s having engaged in an unfair labor 11practice. The ballot shall be so prepared as to permit of a vote against 12representation by anyone named on the ballot. The commission’s certification of 13the results of any election shall be conclusive as to the findings included therein 14unless reviewed in the same manner as provided by s. 111.07 (8) for review of orders 15of the commission.AB999,1616Section 16. 111.05 (3p) of the statutes is created to read:AB999,8,2417111.05 (3p) For employees of the University of Wisconsin Hospitals and 18Clinics Authority, in lieu of an election under sub. (3), if the commission receives a 19petition for certification demonstrating that a majority of employees in a collective 20bargaining unit have authorized a representative, the commission shall certify the 21representative as the exclusive representative. The determination by the 22commission of the sufficiency of a showing of majority support or sufficiency of 23support for a representation is not subject to challenge by any person, employee 24organization, or public employer. AB999,171Section 17. 111.05 (5) of the statutes is created to read:AB999,9,62111.05 (5) (a) 1. Except with respect to existing nonconforming collective 3bargaining units or a combination of employee groups if such a combination is 4requested by a labor organization, collective bargaining units for representation of 5the employees of the University of Wisconsin Hospitals and Clinics Authority shall 6include one unit for each of the following:AB999,9,77a. Registered nurses.AB999,9,88b. Physicians.AB999,9,99c. Professionals except registered nurses and physicians.AB999,9,1010d. Technical employees.AB999,9,1111e. Skilled maintenance employees.AB999,9,1212f. Business office clerical employees.AB999,9,1313g. Guards.AB999,9,1514h. Nonprofessional employees except technical employees, skilled 15maintenance employees, business office clerical employees, and guards. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab999 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab999 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB999 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB999 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB999: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting